Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.61.060

Restitution and costs.

In any prosecution under this section, the court may require restitution from the defendant as provided by chapter 9A.20 RCW, plus court costs plus the costs incurred by the utility on account of the bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized reconnection, including but not limited to costs and expenses for investigation, disconnection, reconnection, service calls, and expert witnesses.

[ 1989 c 109 s 6.]